Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2901
Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act, how cited.

Sections 39-2901 to 39-2939 shall be known and may be cited as the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 1.
July 18, 2026